Wisconsin, session 2025, SB661.
do enact as follows:SB661,13Section 1. 86.325 of the statutes is created to read:SB661,2,3186.325 Local intersection safety program. (1) The department shall 2establish a local intersection safety program. Under the program, the department 3shall do all of the following:SB661,2,54(a) Assist political subdivisions in improving safety at signalized and stop-5sign-controlled intersections.SB661,2,96(b) Upon application by a political subdivision, make improvements or provide 7reimbursements or grants for improvements to signalized and stop-sign-controlled 8intersections on highways under the jurisdiction of the political subdivision. All of 9the following apply to applications for improvements under this subsection:SB661,2,11101. The department shall prescribe the form, nature, and extent of information 11to be contained in applications under this paragraph.SB661,2,17122. The department shall establish criteria for evaluating applications and 13selecting improvements to be completed or funded under this paragraph. An 14intersection selected for improvement must have been identified by the political 15subdivision having jurisdiction over the highway as having an excessively high 16intersection crash rate. The department shall prioritize selecting intersections in 17counties identified under par. (c).SB661,2,2018(c) Using traffic and crash data collected by the department covering the 19years 2019 to 2024, the department shall identify the 10 percent of counties with 20the highest intersection crash rates.SB661,2,2221(d) The department shall expend not less than $6,000,000 for assistance and 22improvements under this section.SB661,223Section 2. Fiscal changes.SB661,3,324(1) In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 1of transportation under s. 20.395 (3) (eq), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 2is increased by $6,000,000 to fund the local intersection safety program under s. 386.325.SB661,3,44